Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202649-505
Distribution to public libraries; section, termination.

After the distribution under sections 49-502 to 49-504, the copies of laws and journals remaining in the hands of the county clerk may, upon the request of the librarians of any public libraries within the county for whose support an annual tax is levied, be distributed to such librarians.

This section terminates on January 1, 2027.

Laws 1907, c. 78, § 5, p. 290;

R.S.1913, § 3737;

C.S.1922, § 3130;

C.S.1929, § 49-505;

R.S.1943, § 49-505;

Laws 2026, LB1236, § 7.
July 18, 2026